Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7872.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 46-13-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-13 entitled "Public
Drinking Water Supply" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-13-10. Correction of unsafe conditions.
When the water from a public water supply system is not safe, potable, or is subject to
contamination as determined by the director, the person maintaining the public water supply system
shall take immediate action to correct sanitary defects, improve operation, provide necessary water
treatment, or make any other changes or additions necessary to provide safe and potable water.
Failure to do so, within the time limits set by the director under the rules and regulations
promulgated by the department of health pursuant to § 46-13-18, and after the hearing provided by
§ 46-13-12, shall result in a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).
Each day of non-compliance shall constitute a separate violation.
SECTION 2. Chapter 46-13 of the General Laws entitled "Public Drinking Water Supply"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-13-23. Penalties for extended service interruptions.
Any public water supplier that fails to restore continuous service to at least ninety percent
(90%) of affected customers within four (4) hours after an unplanned outage, unless caused by
force majeure, shall pay a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per customer for each
additional hour of delay, up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per customer, per day. Said fines shall
be deposited into the general fund and shall in no way limit recovery of other fines and recovered

damages. The director of health may adjust or waive the civil penalty based on hardship, or
noncompliance for reasons beyond the reasonable control of the water supplier acting in good faith.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005192
========
LC005192 - Page 2 of 3